Hawaii statutes.
[ARTICLE
14. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS]

Revision Note

Article heading added by revisor.

[§412:14-100 Automated teller machine
fees.] An owner or operator of an automated teller machine may assess a
transaction fee on any person for use of that machine who uses a card or other
access device for an account that is located within or without the United
States.

Agreements to operate or share an automated
teller machine may not prohibit, limit, or restrict the right of the owner or
operator of the automated teller machine to charge a person a transaction fee.
[L 2008, c 4, §2]

Cross References

Places of business, see §§412:3-500 to 412:3-509.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next